Washington statutes.
RCW 10.116.020

Chokehold or neck restraint prohibited.

(1) A peace officer may not use a chokehold or neck restraint on another person in the course of his or her duties as a peace officer.

(2) Any policies pertaining to the use of force adopted by law enforcement agencies must be consistent with this section.

(3) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Chokehold" means the intentional application of direct pressure to a person's trachea or windpipe for the purpose of restricting another person's airway.

(b) "Neck restraint" refers to any vascular neck restraint or similar restraint, hold, or other tactic in which pressure is applied to the neck for the purpose of constricting blood flow.

[ 2021 c 320 s 2.]